apertium-mos.mos.dix
	<pardef n="wʋʋ/ga__n">
		<e>       <p><l>g</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>d</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>do</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>do</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>dã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>s</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>se</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="yʋʋm/de__n">
		<e>       <p><l>d</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dã</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l></l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="yaab/a__n">
		<e>       <p><l></l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
		<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="yaab-po/aka__n">
		<e>       <p><l>ak</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>aka</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>akã</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gs</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gse</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>gse</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gsã</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>gsã</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="yaab-ra/oogo__n">
			<e>       <p><l>oog</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>aga</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>agã</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>oogo</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>oogã</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ado</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>ad</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>adã</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>adã</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="yaad/em__n">
		<e>       <p><l>em</l>    <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>emã</l>    <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ma</l>      <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>mã</l>      <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="yaad/ga__n">
			<e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l></l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>se</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="ya/oogo__n">
			<e>       <p><l>oog</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>aga</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>agã</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>oogo</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>oogã</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ado</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>ad</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>adã</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>adã</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="yã/oogo__n">
			<e>       <p><l>oog</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>aga</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>agã</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>oogo</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>oogã</l>      <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ado</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>ad</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>adã</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>adã</l>       <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="yaadr/e__n">
		<e>       <p><l></l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
		<e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="yãadr/e__n">
		<e>       <p><l></l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
		<e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="yãad-tʋʋm/de__n">
		<e>       <p><l>d</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dã</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l></l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="yaa/ga__n">
			<e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l></l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>se</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="yãa/ga__n">
			<e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l></l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>se</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="yaagr/e__n">
		<e>       <p><l></l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
		<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
		<e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="wʋʋga">           <i>wʋʋ</i><par n="wʋʋ/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yaaba">           <i>yaab</i><par n="yaab/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yaab-poaka">      <i>yaab-po</i><par n="yaab-po/aka__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yaab-raoogo">     <i>yaab-ra</i><par n="yaab-ra/oogo__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yaadem">          <i>yaad</i><par n="yaad/em__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yaadga">          <i>yaad</i><par n="yaad/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yaoogo">          <i>ya</i><par n="ya/oogo__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yãoogo">          <i>yã</i><par n="yã/oogo__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yaadre">          <i>yaadr</i><par n="yaadr/e__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yãadre">          <i>yãadr</i><par n="yãadr/e__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yãad-tʋʋmde">     <i>yãad-tʋʋm</i><par n="yãad-tʋʋm/de__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yaaga">           <i>yaa</i><par n="yaa/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yãaga">           <i>yãa</i><par n="yãa/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yaagre">          <i>yaagr</i><par n="yaagr/e__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yʋʋmde">         <i>yʋʋm</i><par n="yʋʋm/de__n"/></e>
	<e lm="wʋʋga">           <i>wʋʋ</i><par n="wʋʋ/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yaaba">           <i>yaab</i><par n="yaab/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yaab-poaka">      <i>yaab-po</i><par n="yaab-po/aka__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yaab-raoogo">     <i>yaab-ra</i><par n="yaab-ra/oogo__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yaadem">          <i>yaad</i><par n="yaad/em__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yaadga">          <i>yaad</i><par n="yaad/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yaoogo">          <i>ya</i><par n="ya/oogo__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yãoogo">          <i>yã</i><par n="yã/oogo__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yaadre">          <i>yaadr</i><par n="yaadr/e__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yãadre">          <i>yãadr</i><par n="yãadr/e__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yãad-tʋʋmde">     <i>yãad-tʋʋm</i><par n="yãad-tʋʋm/de__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yaaga">           <i>yaa</i><par n="yaa/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yãaga">           <i>yãa</i><par n="yãa/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yaagre">          <i>yaagr</i><par n="yaagr/e__n"/></e>
	<e lm="yʋʋmde">         <i>yʋʋm</i><par n="yʋʋm/de__n"/></e>
